South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S349.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists, relating to Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists, designated as Regulation Document Number 5334, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists proposes to amend R.36-15 to conform the language to statute. Additionally, the Board proposes to review and update Chapter 36 generally to conform to current standards and requirements regarding Psycho-Educational Specialists, particularly but not limited to R.36-13, 36-17 and 36-25. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on April 26, 2024. ----XX----